test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-rokkw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - rokkõ :   # should decline like the paradigm 'p_kukkõ'
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Nom: rokkõ
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Nom: rokõd
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Gen: roka
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Gen: [rokki, rokkije]
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Par: [rokka, rokkaa]
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Par: [rokki, rokkitõ]
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Ill: [rokkaa, rokkasõ]
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Ill: [rokki, rokkisõ]
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Ine: rokõz
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Ine: rokkiz
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Ela: rokõssõ
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Ela: rokkissõ
    rokkõ+N+Sg+All: rokõllõ
    rokkõ+N+Pl+All: rokkillõ
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Ade: rokõl
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Ade: rokkil
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Abl: rokõltõ
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Abl: rokkiltõ
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Tra: rokõssi
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Tra: rokkissi
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Ter: rokkassaa
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Ter: rokkissaa
    rokkõ+N+Sg+Com: rokaka
    rokkõ+N+Pl+Com: rokkika
